Utah statutes.
10-3-707.   Power to codify ordinances.

Any municipality is hereby empowered to revise, codify and compile from time to time and to publish in book, pamphlet or looseleaf form all ordinances of the municipality of a general and permanent character and to make such changes, alterations, modifications, additions, and substitutions therein as it may deem best to the end that a complete simplified code of the ordinances then enforced shall be presented, but with errors, inconsistencies, repetitions, and ambiguities therein eliminated.



Enacted by Chapter 48, 1977 General Session

